Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-184.01
Restitution order; collection from wage funds.

(1) The department, in consultation with the State Court Administrator, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to provide an effective process for the transfer of funds for the purpose of satisfying restitution orders.

(2) A sentencing order requiring an inmate to pay restitution shall be treated as a court order authorizing the department to withhold and transfer funds for the purpose of satisfying a restitution order.

(3) This section applies to funds in the wage fund of any inmate confined in a correctional facility on or after August 30, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB605, § 97;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 28.
July 18, 2026